Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,145
Nail technology salon license; change of ownership or location; effect.

Each nail technology salon license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and premises named on the license and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or location. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 65;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,216;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 407.